Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,152
Contracts with United States; procedure for confirmation; powers of court.

The practice and procedure for the confirmation of any step or action provided for in section 46-1,151 shall be as nearly as possible in conformity with the practice and procedure provided for the confirmation before the issuance and sale of bonds of irrigation districts. The court may approve and confirm such proceedings in part and disapprove and declare illegal or invalid other and subsequent parts of the proceedings, and insofar as possible the court shall remedy and cure all defects in such proceedings.

Laws 1917, c. 192, § 2, p. 466;

C.S.1922, § 2952;

C.S.1929, § 46-209;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,152.

Practice and procedure for approval of contract with United States is provided. Ainsworth Irr. Dist. v. Harms, 170 Neb. 228, 102 N.W.2d 429 (1960).